test/src/morphology/N-piekk_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - pieˊǩǩ â-stem: # Noun 'kaulaliina' - full paradigm
     pieˊǩǩ+N+Sg+Nom: pieˊǩǩ
     pieˊǩǩ+N+Sg+Gen: pieˊǩǩ
     pieˊǩǩ+N+Sg+Acc: pieˊǩǩ
     pieˊǩǩ+N+Sg+Ill: peâkka
     pieˊǩǩ+N+Sg+Loc: pieˊǩǩest
     pieˊǩǩ+N+Sg+Com: pieˊǩǩin
     pieˊǩǩ+N+Ess: pieˊǩǩen
     pieˊǩǩ+N+Par: pieˊǩǩed
     pieˊǩǩ+N+Sg+Abe: pieˊǩǩtää
     pieˊǩǩ+N+Pl+Nom: pieˊǩǩ
     pieˊǩǩ+N+Pl+Gen: pieˊǩǩi
     pieˊǩǩ+N+Pl+Acc: pieˊǩǩid
     pieˊǩǩ+N+Pl+Ill: pieˊǩǩid
     pieˊǩǩ+N+Pl+Loc: pieˊǩǩin
     pieˊǩǩ+N+Pl+Com: pieˊǩǩivuiˊm
     pieˊǩǩ+N+Pl+Abe: pieˊǩǩitää
